Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.320

Disposition of proceeds of sale when no proof of ownership—Penalty for accepting proceeds after sale, barter, trade.

If, after the expiration of one year from the date of sale, the person presenting the animals for inspection has not provided the director with satisfactory proof of ownership, the proceeds from the sale shall be paid on the claim of the owner of the recorded brand. However, it shall be a gross misdemeanor for the owner of the recorded brand to knowingly accept such funds after he or she has sold, bartered or traded such animals to the claimant or any other person.

[ 2003 c 326 s 39; 1991 c 110 s 6; 1959 c 54 s 32.]